not-to-release/fst/nci.twol
Alphabet
 
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U W X Y Z
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u w x y z

 %{a%}:a
 %{q%}:q %{q%}:c
 %{n%}:n %{n%}:m
 %{i%}:i %{u%}:u
 %{u%}:0
 %{N%}:n %{N%}:m
 %{o%}:o %{o%}:0
 %{i%}:0
 %{T%}:t
 %{C%}:c
 %{é%}:e
 %{O%}:o %{O%}:i %{O%}:0
! h:0

 %~:%~
 %·:%·
 %>:%>
 %«:%« 
 %»:%»

;


Sets

Vow   = a e i o ;

Cns   = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t w x y z u ;


Rules

"Reflexive mo"
o:0 <=> m _ %>: %{i%}: ;
        m _ %>: e Cns ; 
        m _ %>: i Cns ; 

!"Reduplication glottal"
!h:h <=> _ ;
!    except 
!        .#. Cx: Vx: _ Cx: Vx: ;
!        where Cx in Cns 
!		Vx in Vow ;
!

"hu/uh I"
%{u%}:0 <=> %{u%}: h _ %>: [Cns | .#.] ;

!@ c:c a:a {u}:u h:h {u}:0 q:q u:u e:e

"hu/uh II"
%{u%}:0 <=> _ h %{u%}: %>: Vow ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"hui/hua -> uh (I)"
h:u <=>    _ u: [ a: | i: ] %>: [ %{T%}: | %{C%}: ] ;

"hui/hua -> uh (II)"
u:h <=> h: _ [ a: | i: ] %>: [ %{T%}: |  %{C%}: ] ;

!@ o {N}:m > p o l i h:u u:h i:0 > {T}:t i u h

!@ o {N}:n > m {o}:o > c h i h:u u:h a:0 > {C}:c a

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"uh -> hu (I)"
u:h <=> _ h: %>: %{é%}: ;        

"uh -> hu (II)"
h:u <=> u: _ %>: %{é%}: ;

!@ t i a c a u:h h:u > {é}:e

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"uh + huan (I)"
u:0 <=> _ h: %>: h u a n ;

!@ i>teiccauh>huan

"uh + huan (II)"
h:0 <=> u: _ %>: h u a n ;

!@ i>teiccauh>huan

!@ c:c a:a {u}:0 h:h {u}:u a:a

"Objeto I"
u:0 <=> %{q%}:c _  ; 

"Objeto II"
i:0 <=> %{q%}:c u:0 _ %>: ;
                    _ %>: %{i%}: ; 
                    _ %>: %{a%}: ;
                    _ %>: %{T%}: ;

!@ {q}:q u:u i:0 >:0 {i}:i h:h t:t o:o a:a >:0 y:y a:a

"c/qu I"
u:0 <=> _ .#.  ;
        _ %>: q u e ;
        q: _ i: %>: %{T%}: ;

"c/qu I"
q:c <=> _ u:0 .#.  ;
        _ u:0 %>: q u e ;
        _ u:0 :0 %>: %{T%}: ;

!@ o {N}:m > m i q:c u:0 i:0 > {T}:t o c

"i ~ e"
i:0 => %{q%}: u _ %>: e ; 
	except 
		%{q%}:c _ ;
		

!@ {q}:q u:u i:0 >:> e:e l:l l:l a:a c:c u:u a:a h:h u:u a:a

!"removal of -a before ligature"
!Vx:0 <=> o _ %>: t i ·: ; 
!	except
!		_ %>: %{C%}: ;
!	where Vx in ( a ) ;

!@ {q}:q u > t e t e m o a:0 > t i · n e m i

"removal of vow before -tiuh"
Vx:0 <=> [ Cns  - u | i | o | :u :h ] _ %>:  [ %{T%}: | %{C%}: ] ; 
	where Vx in ( a i ) ;


!@ c h a c h a p a n i:0 > {T}:t i u h

!@ n i > c > t l a t i a:0 > {T}:t i u h

!@ m o > m i m i l o a:0 > {T}:t i u h 

!@ t i > m o > m a t i:0 > {T}:t o q u e

!@ o > t e c h > t o q u i l i a:0 > {C}:c o

!@ t i > {q}:q u i {n}:n > « t z o n t e c o n » a c o c u i > {C}:c o



"m>n before {T}"
m:n <=> _ i:0 %>: %{T%}: ; 


!@ t e h t e m:n i:0 > {T}:t i u h


"drop -i before vocative"
Vx:0 <=> _ %>: %{é%}:  ;
	where Vx in ( o i ) ;

!@ t e l p o c h t l i:0 > {é}:e

!@ x o l o:0 > {é}:e

"Vowel harmony in 1/2 with directional -on-"
%{O%}:o <=> _ %>: %{q%}: u: i: %>: o %{N%}: ;

!@ n {O}:o > {q}:c u:0 i:0 > o {N}:m > m a h u i z o a

"Vowel drop in 1/2 with directional -on-"
%{O%}:0 <=> _ %>: o %{N%}: ;
 
!@ t {O}:0 > o {N}:n > t {o}:o > c h o c h o q u i l i a {del}:0 > z > q u e


"drop h from hual after -c-"
h:0 <=> %{q%}:c u: i: %>: _ u a l %> ;

!@ t i > {q}:c u:0 i:0 > h:0 u a l > t:0 l a l i a


"drop t between l and l"
t:0 <=> l »: %>:    _ l ;  
        l    %>:    _ l ;
        l »:        _ l ;
        l »: %>: %« _ l ;

!@ o > « h u e l » > « t:0 l a l l i » m i c t i m o t e c a

!@ t i > {q}:c u:0 i:0 > h:0 u a l > t:0 l a l i a

!@ t i > {q}:c u:0 i:0 > h:0 u a l > t:0 l a l o t i a {del}:0 > q u e

!@ « t l a z o l » > t:0 l a x o > z

!@ {q}:q u i > « t l a l » t:0 l a c u i l h u i a 

"Remove -i from imperative before -on"
i:0 <=> x _ %>: o n ;
!@ x i:0 > o n > y e
